Wyoming statutes. Title 16 City, County, State and Local Powers
Article 6. Payment of Agency Accounts

§ 16-6-601.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Agency” means any department, agency or other instrumentality of the state or of a political subdivision of the state;

“Goods” means all personal property purchased, procured or contracted for by an agency, including leases of real property or other arrangements for the use of space;

“Services” means all services purchased, procured or contracted for by an agency, including construction services.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 64, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it is set out in the printed acts.

§ 16-6-602.
Payment of agency accounts; interest.

Except as provided by contract, any agency which purchases or procures goods and services from a nongovernmental entity shall pay the amount due within forty-five (45) days after receipt of a correct notice of amount due for the goods or services provided or shall pay interest from the forty-fifth day at the rate of one and one-half percent (1 1/2%) per month on the unpaid balance until the account is paid in full, unless a good faith dispute exists as to the agency’s obligation to pay all or a portion of the account.

History.

Laws 1983, ch. 64, § 1.